it: Forma del manichino da addestramento: Uccello; Bumper; Disco; Tronco; Altro
fi: Harjoitusdummyn muoto: Lintu; Noutopukki; Kiekko; Tukki; Muu
th: รูปทรงหุ่นฝึกซ้อม: นก; บัมเปอร์; ดิสก์; ท่อนไม้; อื่นๆ
da: Form på træningsdummy: Fugl; Bumper; Skive; Kævle; Andet
de: Form der Trainingspuppe: Vogel; Bumper; Scheibe; Baumstamm; Sonstige
lt-LT: Treniruočių manekeno formos: Paukštis; Aportavimo lazdelė; Diskas; Rąstas; Kita
hu: Edzőbábu alakja: Madár; Bumper; Korong; Rönk; Egyéb
es: Formas de maniquíes de entrenamiento: Ave; Bumper; Disco; Tronco; Otra
vi: Hình dạng hình nộm huấn luyện: Chim; Miếng chặn; Đĩa; Khúc gỗ; Khác
ro-RO: Forma manechinului de antrenament: Pasăre; Bumper; Disc; Buștean; Altele
en: Training dummy shape: Bird; Bumper; Disk; Log; Other
sk-SK: Tvar tréningovej figuríny: Vták; Aport; Disk; Poleno; Iné
cs: Tvar tréninkové figuríny: Pták; Aport; Disk; Kláda; Jiné
ko: 훈련용 더미 모양: 새; 범퍼; 디스크; 통나무; 기타
zh-TW: 訓練假人形狀: 鳥形; 緩衝型; 圓盤狀; 原木狀; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на тренировъчния манекен: Птица; Бъмпер; Диск; Трупче; Друго
pt-PT: Forma do boneco de treino: Pássaro; Amortecedor; Disco; Tronco; Outro
tr: Eğitim mankeni şekli: Kuş; Tampon; Disk; Kütük; Diğer
sv: Form på träningsdocka: Fågel; Bumper; Skiva; Stock; Övrigt
nl: Trainingsdummy vorm: Vogel; Bumper; Schijf; Boomstam; Overig
pl: Kształt manekina do szkolenia: Ptak; Aport (bumper); Dysk; Kłoda; Inne
ru: Форма тренировочного манекена: Птица; Апортировочный предмет (бампер); Диск; Бревно; Другое
sl-SI: Oblika vadbene lutke: Ptica; Valj; Disk; Deblo; Drugo
fr: Forme du dummy d’entraînement: Oiseau; Apportable; Disque; Bûche; Autre
hr-HR: Oblik lutke za trening: Ptica; Odbojnik; Disk; Trupac; Ostalo
ja: トレーニングダミー形状: 鳥型; バンパー型; ディスク型; 丸太型; その他
zh-CN: 训练假饵形状: 鸟形; 柱形; 飞盘形; 圆木形; 其他
el: Σχήμα ομοιώματος εκπαίδευσης: Πουλί; Κύλινδρος; Δίσκος; Κορμός; Άλλο
pt-BR: Boneco de treino formato: Pássaro; Bumper; Disco; Tronco; Outro
nb: Treningsdukkeform: Fugl; Dummy; Disk; Stokk; Annet